Utah statutes.
41-6a-1116.5.   Local ordinances regulating electric personal assistive mobility devices.

A local authority may adopt an ordinance to regulate or restrict the use of electric personal assistive mobility devices.



Enacted by Chapter 86, 2007 General Session

